ja: 椅子の形状: 輪郭; 長方形; ラウンド; サドル; その他
hu: Ülés formája: Kontúros; Szögletes; Kerek; Nyereg; Egyéb
ru: Форма сиденья: Контурная; Прямоугольник; Круг; Седло; Другое
fr: Forme du siège: Profilé; Rectangulaire; Rond; Selle; Autre
sv: Sätesform: Konturerad; Rektangulär; Rund; Sadel; Övrigt
bg-BG: Форма на седалката: Контурна; Правоъгълна; Кръгла; Седло; Други
nb: Seteform: Konturformet; Rektangulær; Rund; Sal; Annet
th: รูปร่างที่นั่ง: โค้งมน; แบบสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; เนื้อส่วนหลัง; อื่นๆ
pl: Kształt siedziska: Wyprofilowane; Prostokątna; Runda; Siodło; Inne
de: Sitzform: Konturiert; Rechteckig; Rund; Sattel; Sonstiges
es: Forma del asiento: Contorneado; Rectangular; Redondo; Montura; Otros
fi: Istuimen muoto: Muotoiltu; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Satula; Muu
zh-TW: 座椅形狀: 輪廓; 長方形; 圓頭; 座墊; 其他
vi: Hình dạng chỗ ngồi: Hình dạng được định hình; Chữ nhật; Mũi giày tròn; Yên xe; Khác
hr-HR: Oblik sjedala: Konturirano; Pravokutno; Okruglo; U obliku sedla; Ostalo
pt-PT: Formato de assento: Contornado; Retangular; Redondo; Selim; Outro
el: Σχήμα καθίσματος: Με περίγραμμα; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Σέλα; Άλλο
tr: Koltuk şekli: Konturlu; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Eyer; Diğer
it: Forma della seduta: Sagomata; Rettangolare; Rotondo; Sella; Altro
ro-RO: Forma scaunului: Conturat; Dreptunghiular; Rotund; Șa; Altele
lt-LT: Sėdynės forma: Kontūruota; Stačiakampė; Apvali; Balno formos; Kita
nl: Vorm zitting: Voorgevormd; Rechthoekig; Rond; Zadel; Andere
cs: Tvar sedáku: Konturovaný; Obdélníkový; Oválná; Sedlo; Jiné
sl-SI: Oblika sedeža: Oblikovana; Pravokotno; Okrogla; Sedlo; Drugo
da: Sædeform: Kontureret; Rektangulær; Rund; Sadel; Andet
pt-BR: Formato do assento: Contornado; Retangular; Redondo; Sela; Outro
sk-SK: Tvar sedadla: Tvarovaný; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Sedlo; Iné
en: Seat shape: Contoured; Rectangular; Round; Saddle; Other
zh-CN: 座椅形状: 轮廓; 矩形; 圆头; 鞍座; 其他
ko: 시트 모양: 윤곽; 직사각형; 라운드; 새들; 기타